Nebraska, session 109, LB591.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB591 LB591
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 45-1003, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
45-1003 No financial institution is eligible for a license or to
make loans under the Nebraska Installment Loan Act.
A license shall be required for any person that is not a financial
institution who, at or after the time a loan is made by a financial
institution, markets, owns in whole or in part, holds, acquires, or
services , or otherwise participates in such loan.
Sec. 2. Section 45-1004, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
45-1004 (1)(a) Any person may, after procuring a license from the
department, engage or continue in the business of making loans of money
and charge, contract for, and receive the maximum for interest and other
charges in accordance with the authorization and requirements of the
Nebraska Installment Loan Act.
(b) A license shall also be required for any person that services,
or that holds or acquires any rights of ownership interest , servicing,
or other forms of participation in, a loan under the Nebraska Installment
Loan Act or that engages with, or conducts loan activity with, an
installment loan borrower in connection with a loan under the act.
(2)(a) A license is not required for an affiliate of a licensee if
the activities of the affiliate in this state are limited solely to the
securitization of loans made by the licensee and the servicing rights to
the loans are retained by the licensee or assigned or otherwise
transferred to a financial institution, licensee, or permittee.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Affiliate means an entity that controls, is controlled by, or is
under common control with another entity;
(ii) Control means to own directly or indirectly or to control in
any manner twenty-five percent of the voting shares of an entity or to
control in any manner the election of the majority of directors of any
-2-

LB591 LB591
2025 2025
entity; and
(iii) Securitization means the placing of individual installment
loans made by licensees into a commingled or pooled security that is
subsequently sold or otherwise transferred to another entity.
(c) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to exempt a
licensee or affiliate from the Securities Act of Nebraska.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding any other licensee limitations set forth in
the Nebraska Installment Loan Act, a licensee that controls or owns fifty
percent or more of the equity ownership of one or more affiliates which
are subject to licensure under the act may, on behalf of each such
affiliate:
(i) Apply to the department for the license, pay the original
licensee fee, and submit background checks pursuant to section 45-1005
and may complete all other requirements necessary to obtain a license
under the act for each such affiliate; and
(ii) Consolidate all compliance obligations, including, but not
limited to, examinations, reporting requirements, audits, and
investigations, with respect to any such affiliate. The licensee shall
have the right to satisfy any such compliance obligations under the act
on behalf of any such affiliate.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Affiliate has the same meaning as in subsection (2) of this
section; and
(ii) Control has the same meaning as in subsection (2) of this
section.
Sec. 3. Original section 45-1004, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 45-1003, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-3-